Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6365.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) In recent years, the number of retail deliveries of tangible personal property has rapidly
increased, and this rapid growth is expected to continue;
(2) The world economic forum estimates that by 2030, there will be over thirty percent
(30%) more delivery vehicles on roads to deliver seventy-eight percent (78%) more packages,
which will increase usage of the highways, roads and streets of the state by motor vehicles used to
make retail deliveries, and increase traffic congestion, and retail-delivery-related issues;
(3) This additional usage has accelerated and is expected to continue to accelerate
deterioration of surface transportation system infrastructure, and has required and is expected to
continue to require the state and municipalities to perform more maintenance and reconstruction of
state highway, and city streets;
(4) There are administrative costs for a retailer when the state imposes a fee on retail
deliveries, and the benefits from the fee revenue need to be balanced with the potential economic
impacts on the retailers;
(5) Fees on retail deliveries should only be imposed on retailers that are large enough to
absorb these administrative costs without significant economic harm;
(6) It is therefore necessary and appropriate:
(i) To impose a retail delivery fee to offset the potential cost to address infrastructure
deterioration related to retail delivery;

(ii) To create an exemption from the retail delivery fees for retailers with retail sales of five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less; and
(iii) To have the department of revenue collect the retail delivery fee from fee payers.
SECTION 2. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.3
RETAIL DELIVERY FEE
44-18.3-1. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Administrator" means tax administrator appointed pursuant to the provisions of § 44-
1-1.
(2) "Division of taxation" means the Rhode Island department of revenue, division of
taxation. The division may also be referred to in this chapter as the "division of taxation," "tax
division," or division".
(3) "Food service establishment" has the meaning provided in § 21-27-1.
(4) "In-state customer" means a person who makes a purchase of tangible property for use,
storage, and/or consumption in this state.
(5) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in § 34-13.2-2.
(6) "Retail delivery" means delivery to a person located in Rhode Island of tangible
property subject to tax pursuant to the provisions of title 44.
(7) "Retail sale" or "sale at retail" means any retail sale or sale at retail as defined in § 44-
18-8.
(8) "Retailer" means:
(i) Any "marketplace facilitator" or "referrer" as defined in § 44-18.2-2 that has
participated, arranged, or been directly or indirectly involved in sales of goods or tangible property
for the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more in the previous calendar year
delivered by motor vehicle to an end user address in Rhode Island; or
(ii) Any person or entity that sells goods or tangible property to an intended end user;
provided however, that the retailer has retail sales equal to or exceeding five hundred thousand
dollar ($500,000) in gross sales annually delivered by motor vehicle to an intended end user in
Rhode Island.
(9) "State" means the State of Rhode Island.
44-18.3-2. Retail delivery fee.
(a) A fee is imposed on each retailer, as defined in § 44-18.3-1, equal to fifty cents ($0.50)
LC002965 - Page 2 of 5

on each transaction involving retail delivery by motor vehicle to a customer's location in Rhode
Island, of tangible property subject to sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of title 44.
(b) The retailer may, but is not required to, collect the fee imposed pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section from the purchaser. If separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar
document provided to the purchaser the fee is excluded from the sales price for purposes of
calculation of sales and use tax imposed pursuant to the provisions of title 44.
(c) If the retailer collects the fee from the purchaser:
(1) The retail delivery fee shall be charged in addition to any other delivery charges; and
(2) The retailer shall show the total of the retail delivery fee and other delivery fees as
separate items and distinct from the sales price and any other taxes or fees imposed on the retail
delivery on the purchaser's receipt, invoice, or other bill of sale.
44-18.3-3. Multiple items or shipments.
The fee imposed pursuant to § 44-18.3-2 is imposed once per transaction regardless of the
number of shipments necessary to deliver the items of tangible property purchased.
44-18.3-4. Mixed shipments.
If a retailer, subject to the provisions of this chapter, delivers any property in a shipment
that is subject to sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of title 44 then the fee pursuant to §
44-18.3-2 shall be imposed regardless of the volume or amount of tangible property that otherwise
would be exempt from imposition of the fee that is contained in the shipment or delivery.
44-18.3-5. Returns and cancellations.
The fee imposed under § 44-18.3-2 is nonrefundable if any or all items purchased are
returned to a retailer or if the retailer provides a refund or credit in the amount equal to or less than
the purchase price. The fee shall be refunded to the purchaser if the retail delivery is canceled by
the purchaser, retailer, or delivery provider.
44-18.3-6. Exemptions.
(a) The following retail deliveries are exempt from the fee imposed by this chapter:
(1) A retail delivery to a purchaser that is exempt from tax under § 44-18-30;
(2) A retail delivery resulting from a retail sale of food and food ingredients or prepared
food; and
(3) A retail delivery resulting from a retail sale by a food and beverage service
establishment, regardless of whether the retail delivery is made by a third party other than the food
and beverage service establishment.
(b)(1) The fee imposed by this chapter and the requirements of this chapter do not apply to
a retailer that made retail sales of taxable tangible property delivered by motor vehicle to addresses
LC002965 - Page 3 of 5

in Rhode Island totaling less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the previous calendar
year; and
(2) A retailer as defined in § 44-18.3-1 shall begin collecting and remitting the delivery fee
to the director on the first day of a calendar month occurring no later than sixty (60) days after the
retailer exceeds a retail sales threshold of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to sales completed at a physical retail
location or store in which the purchaser takes delivery of the entire purchase of tangible property
at the retail location or store.
44-18.3-7. Rules and regulations.
The administrator of the division of taxation shall promulgate rules and regulations to
implement and enforce the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2025.
========
LC002965
========
LC002965 - Page 4 of 5